Wisconsin, session 2025, SB769.
do enact as follows:SB769,11Section 1. 13.48 (26m) of the statutes is created to read:SB769,2,7213.48 (26m) Lead service line replacement. The legislature finds and 3determines that the prevalence of lead service lines in connections to public water 4systems poses a public health hazard and that processes for reducing lead entering 5drinking water from such pipes requires additional treatment of wastewater. It is 6therefore in the public interest, and it is the public policy of this state, to assist 7private users of public water systems in replacing lead service lines.SB769,28Section 2. 20.866 (2) (td) of the statutes is amended to read:SB769,2,14920.866 (2) (td) Safe drinking water loan program. From the capital 10improvement fund, a sum sufficient to be transferred to the environmental 11improvement fund for the safe drinking water loan program under s. 281.61. The 12state may contract public debt in an amount not to exceed $71,400,000 for this 13purpose. The state may contract additional public debt in an amount up to 14$3,550,000 $274,950,000 for this purpose.SB769,315Section 3. 281.61 (8) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB769,2,1916281.61 (8) (b) The department of administration shall allocate not more than 17$200,000,000 from proceeds of public debt authorized under s. 20.866 (2) (td) to 18projects involving forgivable loans to private users of public water systems to cover 19not more than 50 percent of the cost to replace lead service lines.SB769,2,2020